Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Congressional, Senatorial, and House of Delegates Districts.
§ 24.2-304.03.
House of Delegates districts.

There shall be 100 members of the House of Delegates elected from 100 House of Delegates districts and each district is entitled to representation by one delegate.

All references in this section to boundaries of counties and cities shall be interpreted to refer to those in existence on April 1, 2011, and as reported by the United States Bureau of the Census in the 2010 Census reports provided pursuant to United States Public Law 94-171, notwithstanding subsequent boundary changes by law, annexation, merger, consolidation, or the voiding of boundary changes theretofore made final.

Parts of counties and cities listed in subsection D are defined by reference to the 2010 Census reports for the precincts, parts of precincts, and blocks listed for each House of Delegates district in the Statistical Report on file with the Clerk of the House of Delegates for the Act of Assembly containing the final enactment of this section. Precincts shall be interpreted to refer to those in existence on April 1, 2011, and as reported by the United States Bureau of the Census in the 2010 Census reports provided pursuant to United States Public Law 94-171, notwithstanding subsequent changes made by localities.

The 100 House of Delegates districts are:First. All of Lee and Scott Counties; all of the City of Norton; and part of Wise County comprised of the Appalachia (101), Big Stone Gap (301), Clinch Valley (401), Dorchester (102), East Stone Gap (302), Guest River (103), and Wise (202) Precincts and part of the East Pound (203) Precinct.Second. Part of Prince William County comprised of the Belmont (701), Featherstone (704), Potomac View (705), Quantico (304), Rippon (706), River Oaks (708), and Swans Creek (311) Precincts; and part of Stafford County comprised of the Rock Hill (201), Roseville (202), Ruby (203), Stefaniga (204), Widewater (302), and Woodlands (701) Precincts and part of the Whitson (702) Precinct.Third. All of Bland, Buchanan, and Tazewell Counties; and part of Russell County comprised of the Drill (401) and Swords Creek (402) Precincts and part of the Honaker (303) Precinct.Fourth. All of Dickenson County; part of Russell County comprised of the Cleveland (203), Cooks Mill (301), Copper Creek (102), Dante (202), Daughterty (302), East Lebanon (501), Elk Garden (403), Moccasin (101), North Castlewood (201), South Castlewood (103), and West Lebanon (502) Precincts and part of the Honaker (303) Precinct; part of Washington County comprised of the Burson Place (601), East Abingdon (101), Greendale (202), Mendota (602), South Abingdon (302), Valley Institute (603), Wallace (702), and West Abingdon (102) Precincts; and part of Wise County comprised of the North Coeburn (201), South Coeburn (402), St. Paul (403), and West Pound (104) Precincts and part of the East Pound (203) Precinct.Fifth. All of Grayson County; all of the Cities of Bristol and Galax; part of Smyth County comprised of the Adwolfe (701), Chilhowie (301), Konnarock (703), Royal Oak West (602), Seven Mile Ford (201), and St. Clair (302) Precincts; and part of Washington County comprised of the Clinchburg (201), Damascus (502), Glade Spring (401), Green Cove (504), Hayter’s Gap (203), High Point (701), John Battle (703), Meadowview (402), Rhea Valley (501), and Watauga (301) Precincts.Sixth. All of Carroll and Wythe Counties; and part of Smyth County comprised of the Atkins (501), East Park (401), Rich Valley (202), Royal Oak East (601), Saltville (101), Sugar Grove (702), Wassona (502), and West Park (402) Precincts.Seventh. All of Floyd County; part of Montgomery County comprised of the B-3 (203), B-4 (204), C-2 (302), D-1 (401), D-2 (402), D-3 Part 1 (403), D-4 (404), and D-5 (405) Precincts and part of the E-1 (501) Precinct; and part of Pulaski County comprised of the Draper (201), Dublin (301), Hiwassee (302), Massie (401), Newbern (203), Robinson (501), Snowville (304), South Pulaski (202), Walker (402), and West Cloyd (103) Precincts.Eighth. All of Craig County; all of the City of Salem; part of Montgomery County comprised of the A-1 (101), B-2 (202), C-1 (301), C-3 (303), and C-4 (304) Precincts; and part of Roanoke County comprised of the Bennett Springs (107), Bent Mountain (301), Castle Rock (305), Catawba (101), Cave Spring (503), Cotton Hill (501), Glenvar (103), Green Hill (106), Mason Valley (102), Oak Grove (304), Poages Mill (302), and Wildwood (108) Precincts and part of the Penn Forest (502) Precinct.Ninth. All of Patrick County; part of Franklin County comprised of the Boones Mill (601), Bowmans (503), Callaway (502), Dickinson (304), Dudley (204), Endicott (403), Ferrum (402), Fork Mountain (302), Glade Hill (201), Gogginsville (504), Henry (401), Hodgesville (203), Penhook (202), Rocky Mount East (701), Rocky Mount South (703), Rocky Mount West (702), Scruggs (103), Snow Creek (301), Sontag (303), and Waidsboro (501) Precincts; and part of Henry County comprised of the Bassett No. 1 (501), Bassett No. 2 (101), Gunville (102), Horsepasture #1 (202), Scott’s Tanyard (103), and Spencer (204) Precincts.Tenth. Part of Clarke County comprised of the White Post (401) Precinct and part of the Millwood (301) Precinct; part of Frederick County comprised of the Carpers Valley (401) and Shenandoah (402) Precincts and part of the Parkins Mill (403) Precinct; and part of Loudoun County comprised of the Aldie (309), Brandon Park (506), Briar Woods (111), Cool Spring (505), Dry Mill (503), East Leesburg (502), Evergreen (408), Harper Park (407), Middleburg (307), Smart’s Mill (504), St. Louis (308), Tolbert (410), and West Leesburg (501) Precincts and parts of the Belmont Ridge (815), Philomont (305), and Pinebrook (115) Precincts.Eleventh. Part of the City of Roanoke comprised of the Eureka Park (020), Fishburn Park (031), Highland No. 1 (001), Highland No. 2 (002), Jefferson No. 1 (005), Jefferson No. 2 (008), Lincoln Terrace (016), Melrose (019), Peters Creek (018), Raleigh Court No. 1 (024), Raleigh Court No. 2 (026), Raleigh Court No. 3 (027), Raleigh Court No. 4 (028), Raleigh Court No. 5 (029), South Roanoke No. 1 (033), South Roanoke No. 2 (034), Tinker (009), Villa Heights (021), Wasena (030), Washington Heights (022), Westside (023), Williamson Road No. 1 (010), Williamson Road No. 2 (011), Williamson Road No. 3 (012), Williamson Road No. 4 (013), Williamson Road No. 5 (014), and Williamson Road No. 6 (015) Precincts.Twelfth. All of Giles County; all of the City of Radford; part of Montgomery County comprised of the A-2 (102), A-3 (103), B-1 (201), D-3 Part 2 (4032), E-2 (502), F-1 (601), F-2 (602), G-1 (701), and G-2 (702) Precincts and part of the E-1 (501) Precinct; and part of Pulaski County comprised of the Belspring (101) and New River (102) Precincts.Thirteenth. All of the City of Manassas Park; and part of Prince William County comprised of the Buckland Mills (110), Bull Run (403), Glenkirk (408), Limestone (113), Mullen (411), Pace West (412), Parkside (105), Signal Hill (114), Sinclair (404), and Sudley North (409) Precincts and parts of the Battlefield (402) and Stonewall (405) Precincts.Fourteenth. All of the City of Danville; part of Henry County comprised of the Fontaine (601), Hillcrest (602), Irisburg (303), Mount Olivet (304), Ridgeway #1 (603), and Ridgeway #2 (604) Precincts and part of the Axton (302) Precinct; and part of Pittsylvania County comprised of the Bachelors Hall (702), Brosville (606), Ferry Road (703), Keeling (402), Kentuck (404), Mt. Hermon (704), Ringgold (405), and Stony Mill (603) Precincts.Fifteenth. All of Page and Shenandoah Counties; part of Rockingham County comprised of the Lacey Spring (105) and Tenth Legion (106) Precincts and part of the Plains (107) Precinct; and part of Warren County comprised of the Bentonville (502), Browntown (504), Fork Town (101), Otterburn (102), and Waterlick (103) Precincts.Sixteenth. All of the City of Martinsville; part of Henry County comprised of the Collinsville Number 1 (401), Collinsville Number 2 (404), Daniel’s Creek (402), Dyers Store (505), Fieldale (201), Figsboro (502), Horsepasture #2 (203), Mountain Valley (305), Mountain View (405), Oak Level (504), and Stanleytown (503) Precincts and part of the Axton (302) Precinct; and part of Pittsylvania County comprised of the Bearskin (602), Callands (201), Central (301), Chatham (105), Climax (206), Dry Fork (607), East Blairs (307), East Gretna (309), Gretna (207), Hurt (501), Motley Sycamore (502), Mt. Airy (308), Mt. Cross (705), Renan (503), Riceville (305), Sandy Level (204), Swansonville (604), Tunstall (106), Twin Springs (103), West Blairs (108), and Whitmell (605) Precincts.Seventeenth. Part of Botetourt County comprised of the Cloverdale (502) Precinct; part of Roanoke County comprised of the Bonsack (402), Botetourt Springs (204), Burlington (202), Clearbrook (505), Garst Mill (306), Hollins (206), Hunting Hills (507), Lindenwood (405), Mount Pleasant (406), Mount Vernon (506), Mountain View (203), North Vinton (403), Northside (104), Ogden (504), Orchards (205), Peters Creek (105), Plantation (201), South Vinton (404), and Windsor Hills (303) Precincts and part of the Penn Forest (502) Precinct; and part of the City of Roanoke comprised of the Garden City (037), Grandin Court (032), Jefferson-Riverdale (007), Lee-Hi (035), and Monterey (017) Precincts.Eighteenth. All of Rappahannock County; part of Culpeper County comprised of the Brandy Station (702), Eggbornsville (302), Jeffersonton (501), and Rixeyville (502) Precincts; part of Fauquier County comprised of the Airlie (202), Baldwin Ridge (203), Bealeton (303), Broad Run (503), Courthouse (201), Leeds (402), Marshall (401), Opal (105), The Plains (501), Warrenton (204), and Waterloo (403) Precincts; and part of Warren County comprised of the East Shenandoah (401), Happy Creek (201), Linden (202), and South River (501) Precincts.Nineteenth. All of Alleghany County; all of the Cities of Bedford and Covington; part of Bedford County comprised of the Bedford Christian Church (703), Bedford County PSA (302), Goode Rescue Squad (701), Goodview Elem School (101), Hardy Fire & Rescue Bldg (102), Montvale Elem School (601), Saunders Grove Brethren Church (604), and Shady Grove Baptist Church (602) Precincts and parts of the Liberty High School (702) and Thaxton Elem School (603) Precincts; and part of Botetourt County comprised of the Amsterdam (101), Asbury (102), Blue Ridge (201), Buchanan (301), Courthouse (402), Coyner Springs (501), Eagle Rock (403), Glen Wilton (404), Mill Creek (302), Oriskany (405), Rainbow Forest (202), Roaring Run (303), Springwood (304), Town Hall (406), and Troutville (104) Precincts.Twentieth. All of Highland County; all of the Cities of Staunton and Waynesboro; part of Augusta County comprised of the Buffalo Gap (401), Cedar Green (405), Churchville Fire Station (304), Churchville School (402), Deerfield (404), Expo (102), Jolivue (101), Lyndhurst (603), Mount Solon (303), North River (302), and Sherando (601) Precincts and parts of the Fisherville (802) and White Hill (504) Precincts; and part of Nelson County comprised of the Montebello (402), Nellysford (502), Rockfish (101), and Roseland (401) Precincts.Twenty-first. Part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the Waterway (049) Precinct; and part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Bellamy (043), Centerville (044), Colonial (065), Cromwell (054), Dahlia (073), Glenwood (058), Hillcrest (087), Indian Lakes (078), Lake Christopher (089), Manor (068), Rosemont Forest (064), Round Hill (071), Stratford Chase (051), Timberlake (045), and Windsor Oaks (036) Precincts.Twenty-second. Part of Bedford County comprised of the Bethesda Methodist Church (303), Body Camp Elem School (204), Chamblissburg First Aid Bldg (103), Forest Youth Athletic Assoc. (304), Huddleston Elem School (305), Knights Of Columbus Bldg (403), Moneta Elem School (203), New London Academy (301), Pleasant View (507), Saunders Vol Fire Dept (205), Staunton River High School (202), and Thomas Jefferson Elem School (402) Precincts; part of Campbell County comprised of the Airport (601), Brookville (101), Kings (602), New London (102), and Walker (201) Precincts; part of Franklin County comprised of the Bonbrook (602), Burnt Chimney (102) and Cooper’s Cove (603) Precincts; and part of the City of Lynchburg comprised of the Second Ward First Precinct (201), Second Ward Second Precinct (202), Second Ward Third Precinct (203), Third Ward First Precinct (301), Third Ward Second Precinct (302), and Third Ward Third Precinct (303) Precincts.Twenty-third. Part of Amherst County comprised of the Madison (501) and Wright Shop (101) Precincts and parts of the Amelon (401) and Elon (302) Precincts; part of Bedford County comprised of the Big Island Elem School (502), Boonsboro Elem School (505), Boonsboro Ruritan Club (506), Forest Elem School (401), Odd Fellows Hall (504), Sedalia Center (503), and Suck Springs (704) Precincts and parts of the Liberty High School (702) and Thaxton Elem School (603) Precincts; and part of the City of Lynchburg comprised of the First Ward First Precinct (101), First Ward Second Precinct (102), First Ward Third Precinct (103), First Ward Fourth Precinct (104), First Ward Fifth Precinct (105), Third Ward Fourth Precinct (304), Third Ward Fifth Precinct (305), Fourth Ward First Precinct (401), Fourth Ward Second Precinct (402), Fourth Ward Third Precinct (403), and Fourth Ward Fourth Precinct (404) Precincts.Twenty-fourth. All of Bath and Rockbridge Counties; all of the Cities of Buena Vista and Lexington; part of Amherst County comprised of the Coolwell (103), Courthouse (201), Lonco (402), Monroe (301), New Glasgow (102), Pleasant View (303), and Temperance (202) Precincts and parts of the Amelon (401) and Elon (302) Precincts; and part of Augusta County comprised of the Craigsville (403), Greenville (501), Middlebrook (502), Spottswood (503), and Stuarts Draft (602) Precincts and part of the White Hill (504) Precinct.Twenty-fifth. Part of Albemarle County comprised of the Belfield (204), Brownsville (604), Crozet (601), Ivy (301), Jack Jouett (201), and Yellow Mountain (605) Precincts and part of the East Ivy (304) Precinct; part of Augusta County comprised of the Crimora (201), Dooms (801), Fort Defiance (301), New Hope (202), Verona (103), Weyers Cave (203), and Wilson (803) Precincts and part of the Fishersville (802) Precinct; and part of Rockingham County comprised of the Bridgewater (401), Grottoes (304), Massanetta Springs (305), Montezuma (402), Mt. Crawford (403), North River (303), Ottobine (207), and Port Republic (302) Precincts.Twenty-sixth. All of the City of Harrisonburg; and part of Rockingham County comprised of the Bergton (104), Broadway (101), Dayton (404), Edom (202), Fulks Run (103), Keezletown (301), Melrose (203), Mt. Clinton (204), Silver Lake (405), Singers Glen (201), Stony Run (505), and Timberville (102) Precincts and part of the Plains (107) Precinct.Twenty-seventh. Part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Beaufont (513), Crenshaw (414), Crestwood (502), Deer Run (302), Genito (402), Harbour Pointe (401), Huguenot (501), Jacobs (204), La Prade (405), Manchester (409), Monacan (407), Providence (404), Reams (408), S. Manchester (308), Spring Run (316), St. Lukes (212), Wagstaff (410), and Watkins (514) Precincts and parts of the Bailey Bridge (315), Davis (515), and Evergreen (312) Precincts.Twenty-eighth. Part of Stafford County comprised of the Aquia (401), Brooke (403), Chatham (602), Courthouse (402), Drew (503), Falmouth (502), Ferry Farm (601), Gayle (504), Grafton (501), Griffis (301), Harbor (303), and White Oak (603) Precincts and part of the Hampton (703) Precinct; and part of the City of Fredericksburg comprised of the District 2 (201) and District 4-Precinct 2 (402) Precincts and part of the District 4 (401) Precinct.Twenty-ninth. All of the City of Winchester; part of Frederick County comprised of the Albin (202), Canterburg (503), Cedar Creek (104), Gainesborough (201), Gore (102), Kernstown (103), Newtown (502), Redland (203), Russells (101), Stephens City (501), and White Hall (303) Precincts and part of the Parkins Mill (403) Precinct; and part of Warren County comprised of the North River (301), Reliance (303), Riverton (302), and West Shenandoah (402) Precincts.Thirtieth. All of Madison and Orange Counties; and part of Culpeper County comprised of the Brown’s Store (402), Cardova (303), East Fairfax (201), Eldorado (401), Lignum (703), Mitchells (601), Pearl Sample (602), Richardsville (704), and West Fairfax (101) Precincts.Thirty-first. Part of Fauquier County comprised of the Casanova (103), Catlett (102), Kettle Run (101), and New Baltimore (502) Precincts; and part of Prince William County comprised of the Ashland (309), Beville (205), Enterprise (608), Forest Park (310), King (206), Lodge (207), Montclair (308), Park (109), Pattie (305), Powell (211), Saunders (201), and Washington-Reid (306) Precincts and parts of the Benton (203), Godwin (603), Henderson (307), and Minnieville (605) Precincts.Thirty-second. Part of Loudoun County comprised of the Algonkian (208), Ashburn Farm (102), Cedar Lane (810), Dominion (811), Eagle Ridge (106), Farmwell Station (812), Hillside (105), Newton-Lee (814), Russell Branch (809), Sanders Corner (101), Selden’s Landing (813), Stone Bridge (808), and Weller (816) Precincts and parts of the Belmont Ridge (815), Countryside (213), and Mill Run (113) Precincts.Thirty-third. Part of Clarke County comprised of the Berryville (201), Blue Ridge (502), Buckmarsh (501), Pine Grove (302), and Russell (101) Precincts and part of the Millwood (301) Precinct; part of Frederick County comprised of the Ash Hollow (602), Clear Brook (301), Greenwood (603), Millbrook (601), and Neffs Town (302) Precincts; and part of Loudoun County comprised of the Balls Bluff (406), Between The Hills (306), Clarkes Gap (409), East Lovettsville (411), Greenway (405), Hamilton (304), Heritage (412), Hillsboro (303), Lucketts (403), Purcellville One (301), Purcellville Two (310), Round Hill (302), Waterford (402), West Lovettsville (401), and Woodgrove (311) Precincts and part of the Philomont (305) Precinct.Thirty-fourth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Chain Bridge (301), Churchill (303), Colvin (330), Cooper (304), Forestville (322), Great Falls (306), Hickory (328), Kenmore (309), Langley (311), Seneca (329), Shouse (323), Spring Hill (331), Westbriar (219), and Wolftrap (226) Precincts and part of the Salona (316) Precinct; and part of Loudoun County comprised of the Lowes Island (607), Potomac Falls (209), River Bend (207), Seneca (606), South Bank (609), Sugarland North (604), and Sugarland South (605) Precincts.Thirty-fifth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Blake (701), Centerpointe (844), Freedom Hill (704), Kilmer (733), Magarity (726), Nottoway (729), Oak Marr (732), Oakton (727), Penderbrook (730), Stenwood (719), Thoreau (720), Tysons (731), Vienna #1 (213), Vienna #2 (214), Vienna #4 (216), and Vienna #6 (218) Precincts and parts of the Flint Hill (202) and Mosby (709) Precincts.Thirty-sixth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Aldrin (234), Cameron Glen (238), Dogwood (220), Frying Pan (235), Glade (223), Hunters Woods (221), McNair (237), North Point (233), Reston #1 (208), Reston #2 (209), Reston #3 (222), South Lakes (224), Sunrise Valley (227), and Terraset (225) Precincts and parts of the Flint Hill (202) and Vale (914) Precincts.Thirty-seventh. All of the City of Fairfax; and part of Fairfax County comprised of the Eagle View (853), Fair Oaks (848), Fairfax A (0700), London Towne East (910), Monument (852), Powell (926), Sideburn (120), and Villa (121) Precincts and parts of the London Towne West (924), Mosby (709), Stone (917), Willow Springs (851), and Woodson (117) Precincts.Thirty-eighth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Barcroft (502), Belvedere (503), Bristow (102), Brook Hill (521), Columbia (518), Heritage (106), Holmes #1 (506), Holmes #2 (530), Hummer (519), Lincolnia (507), Masonville (508), Parklawn (510), Poe (523), Ravenwood (511), Saint Albans (513), Sleepy Hollow (512), and Westlawn (515) Precincts and parts of the Baileys (501) and Weyanoke (516) Precincts.Thirty-ninth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Alban (623), Bren Mar (526), Chapel (104), Crestwood (415), Edsall (527), Garfield (417), Greenspring (426), Kings Park (108), Leewood (531), Long Branch (122), Lynbrook (418), North Springfield # 1 (110), North Springfield # 2 (111), Oak Hill (113), Pioneer (409), Ravensworth (115), Ridgelea (528), Saratoga (626), and Wakefield (116) Precincts and parts of the Camelot (522), Lake Braddock (118), Lane (419), and Weyanoke (516) Precincts.Fortieth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Bull Run (923), Centre Ridge (901), Centreville (918), Clifton (803), Deer Park (921), Fairfax Station (805), Green Trails (919), Newgate North (849), Newgate South (854), Old Mill (925), Popes Head (841), and Virginia Run (915) Precincts and parts of the London Towne West (924), Willow Springs (851), and Woodyard (815) Precincts; and part of Prince William County comprised of the Mountain View (410) Precinct and parts of the Alvey (406) and Battlefield (402) Precincts.Forty-first. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Bonnie Brae (126), Burke (801), Burke Centre (127), Cherry Run (825), Fairview (105), Laurel (119), Mantua (707), Olde Creek (109), Olley (124), Parkway (842), Price (711), Robinson (123), Signal Hill (125), Terra Centre (130), and White Oaks (833) Precincts and parts of the Lake Braddock (118), Pohick (811), and Woodson (117) Precincts.Forty-second. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Cardinal (128), Fountainhead (845), Gunston (616), Hunt (624), Irving (827), Keene Mill (129), Laurel Hill (628), Newington (618), Orange (824), Sangster (838), Silverbrook (839), South County (629), South Run (850), Valley (812), West Springfield (840), and Westgate (613) Precincts and parts of the Lorton (617), Pohick (811), and Woodyard (815) Precincts.Forty-third. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Bush Hill (401), Cameron (402), Clermont (423), Franconia (404), Huntley (424), Island Creek (427), Kingstowne (421), Lorton Center (625), Lorton Station (622), Mount Eagle (408), Rose Hill (410), Van Dorn (422), Villages (420), Virginia Hills (411), and Wilton (425) Precincts and parts of the Belvoir (619), Hayfield (406), Huntington (607), Lane (419), and Lorton (617) Precincts.Forty-fourth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Bucknell (604), Fairfield (413), Fort Hunt (605), Groveton (405), Hollin Hall (606), Kirkside (608), Marlan (609), Sherwood (610), Stratford (611), Waynewood (612), Whitman (614), Woodlawn (627), and Woodley (615) Precincts and parts of the Belle Haven (601), Belvoir (619), and Hayfield (406) Precincts.Forty-fifth. Part of Arlington County comprised of the Abingdon (022), Aurora Hills (003), Fairlington (012), and Shirlington (042) Precincts and part of the Oakridge (032) Precinct; part of Fairfax County comprised of the Belleview (602) and Grosvenor (621) Precincts and parts of the Belle Haven (601) and Huntington (607) Precincts; and part of the City of Alexandria comprised of the Agudas Achim Synagogue (203), Blessed Sacrament Church (204), City Hall (102), Cora Kelley Center (106), Durant Center (104), Fire Department Headquarters (109), George Mason School (202), George Washington Middle School (108), Ladrey Senior Building (101), Lee Center (105), Lyles Crouch School (103), Maury School (201), and Mt. Vernon Recreation Center (107) Precincts.Forty-sixth. Part of the City of Alexandria comprised of the Cameron Station Community Center (308), Charles E. Beatley Library (303), Chinquapin Park Recreation Center (206), Douglas MacArthur School (205), James K. Polk School (209), John Adams School (305), Nova Arts Center (208), Patrick Henry Rec Center (302), Samuel Tucker School (304), South Port (307), St. James Church (210), Temple Beth El Synagogue (207), and William Ramsey School (306) Precincts.Forty-seventh. Part of Arlington County comprised of the Arlington Forest (025), Ashlawn (039), Ashton Heights (002), Ballston (004), Barcroft (005), Buckingham (045), Central (046), Clarendon (014), Courtlands (048), Dominion Hills (029), East Falls Church (011), Glen Carlyn (013), Lexington (031), Lyon Park (015), Monroe (049), Nottingham (037), Overlee Knolls (017), Park Lane (018), Taylor (051), Virginia Square (040), Westover (023), and Woodbury (041) Precincts and part of the Jefferson (027) Precinct.Forty-eighth. Part of Arlington County comprised of the Cherrydale (007), Crystal City (006), Crystal Plaza (050), Dawson (044), Lyon Village (016), Madison (035), Marshall (036), Rock Spring (033), Rosslyn (019), Thrifton (020), Wilson (010), Woodlawn (024), and Yorktown (034) Precincts; and part of Fairfax County comprised of the Chesterbrook (302), El Nido (305), Haycock (307), Kirby (310), Longfellow (312), McLean (314), and Westmoreland (318) Precincts and part of the Salona (316) Precinct.Forty-ninth. Part of Arlington County comprised of the Arlington (001), Arlington Mill (043), Arlington View (038), Claremont (028), Columbia (009), Fillmore (026), Four Mile Run (047), Glebe (030), Hume (008), and Virginia Highlands (021) Precincts and parts of the Jefferson (027) and Oakridge (032) Precincts; and part of Fairfax County comprised of the Glen Forest (505), Glen Forest #2 (529), Skyline (520), and Willston (517) Precincts and part of the Baileys (501) Precinct.Fiftieth. All of the City of Manassas; and part of Prince William County comprised of the Bristow Run (111), Cedar Point (112), Ellis (106), Marsteller (107), Pr. William A (000), Victory (108), and Westgate (407) Precincts and part of the Stonewall (405) Precinct.Fifty-first. Part of Prince William County comprised of the Bennett (102), Bethel (506), Brentsville (101), Buckhall (103), Chinn (507), Kerrydale (607), Lake Ridge (501), Marshall (202), McCoart (204), Mohican (505), Nokesville (104), Old Bridge (503), Penn (210), Rockledge (504), Springwoods (508), Westridge (208), and Woodbine (209) Precincts and part of the Benton (203) Precinct.Fifty-second. Part of Prince William County comprised of the Bel Air (606), Civic Center (604), Dale (601), Dumfries (301), Freedom (609), Graham Park (303), Kilby (707), Library (702), Lynn (703), Neabsco (602), Occoquan (502), and Potomac (302) Precincts and parts of the Godwin (603), Henderson (307), and Minnieville (605) Precincts.Fifty-third. All of the City of Falls Church; and part of Fairfax County comprised of the Fort Buffalo (703), Graham (705), Greenway (706), Marshall (708), Merrifield (721), Pimmit (315), Pine Ridge (718), Pine Spring (710), Shreve (712), Timber Lane (713), Walker (714), Walnut Hill # 1 (525), Walnut Hill # 2 (728), Westhampton (317), Whittier (524), and Woodburn (717) Precincts and part of the Camelot (522) Precinct.Fifty-fourth. Part of Caroline County comprised of the Woodford (303) Precinct; and part of Spotsylvania County comprised of the Battlefield (701), Brock (505), Chancellor (204), Courthouse (504), Fairview (703), Frazers Gate (402), Lee Hill (403), Massaponax (104), Piedmont (603), Salem (601), Smith Station (602), Summit (401), Todd’s Tavern (503), and Travelers Rest (103) Precincts and part of the Brokenburg (502) Precinct.Fifty-fifth. Part of Caroline County comprised of the Chilesburg (302), Madison (201), Mattaponi (501), Penola (402), and Reedy Church (401) Precincts; part of Hanover County comprised of the Ashcake (103), Ashland (101), Atlee (304), Beaverdam (201), Blunts (202), Chickahominy (302), Cool Spring (305), Courthouse (206), Elmont (704), Farrington (701), Goddin’s Hill (204), Montpelier (702), Rockville (703), Sliding Hill (104), Stony Run (207), and Wilmington Parish (203) Precincts; and part of Spotsylvania County comprised of the Blaydes Corner (102) and Partlow (101) Precincts and part of the Brokenburg (502) Precinct.Fifty-sixth. All of Louisa County; part of Goochland County comprised of the Centerville (402), Crozier (401), and Manakin (501) Precincts and part of the Goochland Court House (301) Precinct; part of Henrico County comprised of the Causeway (301), Nuckols Farm (307), Rivers Edge (317), Sadler (310), Shady Grove (311), Short Pump (318), and West End (416) Precincts; and part of Spotsylvania County comprised of the Belmont (501) Precinct and part of the Brokenburg (502) Precinct.Fifty-seventh. All of the City of Charlottesville; and part of Albemarle County comprised of the Agnor-Hurt (104), Branchlands (103), Cale (405), Dunlora (105), Georgetown (203), University Hall (202), and Woodbrook (101) Precincts and parts of the East Ivy (304) and Free Bridge (504) Precincts.Fifty-eighth. All of Greene County; part of Albemarle County comprised of the Burnley (505), Earlysville (603), Free Union (602), Hollymead (503), Keswick (501), Monticello (402), Northside (106), Scottsville (401), Stone Robinson (406), and Stony Point (502) Precincts and part of the Free Bridge (504) Precinct; part of Fluvanna County comprised of the Cunningham (401), Palmyra (101), Rivanna (501), and Rivanna 2 (502) Precincts; and part of Rockingham County comprised of the Cross Keys (306), Elkton (501), McGaheysville (503), South Fork (504), and Swift Run (502) Precincts.Fifty-ninth. All of Appomattox and Buckingham Counties; part of Albemarle County comprised of the Country Green (305), Porter’s (403), and Red Hill (302) Precincts; part of Campbell County comprised of the Altavista (303), Bedford Springs (202), Concord (603), Court House (402), Evington (301), Lynch Station (302), Spring Hill (501), Three Forks (401), and Yellow Branch (502) Precincts; and part of Nelson County comprised of the Faber (501), Gladstone (302), Lovingston (201), Schuyler (202), and Shipman (301) Precincts.Sixtieth. All of Charlotte, Halifax, and Prince Edward Counties; and part of Campbell County comprised of the Brookneal (701), Gladys (702), and Morris Church (703) Precincts.Sixty-first. All of Amelia, Cumberland, Mecklenburg, and Nottoway Counties; and part of Lunenburg County comprised of the Arrowhead Gun Club (401), Flat Rock (302), Meherrin Fire Dept (701), Pleasant Grove (402), Plymouth (101), and Reedy Creek (501) Precincts and parts of the Brown’s Store (201), Peoples Community Center (502), Rosebud (301), and Victoria Public Library (702) Precincts.Sixty-second. Part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Bellwood (101), Beulah (202), Bird (203), Dutch Gap (110), Elizabeth Scott (109), Enon (103), Five Forks (210), Gates (201), North Chester (104), and Salem Church (209) Precincts; part of Henrico County comprised of the Sandston (515), Town Hall (517), and Whitlocks (518) Precincts and part of the Dorey (505) Precinct; part of Prince George County comprised of parts of the Courts Bldg (204), Jefferson Park (205), and Rives (104) Precincts; and part of the City of Hopewell comprised of the Ward 1 (101), Ward 3 (301), Ward 4 (401), and Ward 5 (501) Precincts and part of the Ward 7 (701) Precinct.Sixty-third. All of the City of Petersburg; part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Ettrick (301) and Matoaca (303) Precincts; part of Dinwiddie County comprised of the Chesdin (202), Church Road (103), Courthouse (501), Rocky Run (503), and White Oak (102) Precincts and parts of the Dinwiddie (401), Edgehill (201), New Hope (302), and Rohoic (101) Precincts; part of Prince George County comprised of parts of the Courts Bldg (204), Jefferson Park (205), and Rives (104) Precincts; and part of the City of Hopewell comprised of the Ward 2 (201) and Ward 6 (601) Precincts and part of the Ward 7 (701) Precinct.Sixty-fourth. Part of Isle of Wight County comprised of the Bartlett (201), Carrollton (202), Courthouse (401), Orbit (403), Pons (302), Raynor (505), Rushmere (301), Smithfield (101), Walters (501), Windsor (402), and Zuni (504) Precincts and parts of the Camps Mill (502) and Carrsville (503) Precincts; part of Prince George County comprised of the Blackwater (202), Bland (201), Brandon (203), Harrison (105), Richard Bland (101), Templeton (102), and Union Branch (103) Precincts and parts of the Courts Bldg (204) and Rives (104) Precincts; part of Southampton County comprised of the Berlin (101), Hunterdale (501), Ivor (102), and Sedley (602) Precincts and part of the Forks-Of-The-River (502) Precinct; part of Surry County comprised of the Bacon’s Castle (201), Carsley (401), Claremont (501), Spring Grove (502), Surry (101), and Wall’s Bridge (302) Precincts; part of Sussex County comprised of the Blackwater (601) and Wakefield (302) Precincts; part of the City of Franklin comprised of the Precinct

1-1

(101) Precinct and parts of the Precinct

2-1

(201) and Precinct

6-1

(601) Precincts; and part of the City of Suffolk comprised of the Holland (502), Holy Neck (503), and Whaleyville (402) Precincts.Sixty-fifth. All of Powhatan County; part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Brandermill (403), Skinquarter (309), Swift Creek (411), Tomahawk (310), and Woolridge (313) Precincts and parts of the Evergreen (312) and Midlothian (503) Precincts; part of Fluvanna County comprised of the Columbia (201) and Fork Union (301) Precincts; and part of Goochland County comprised of the Fife (101), Hadensville (102), Sandy Hook (202), and Three Square (201) Precincts and part of the Goochland Court House (301) Precinct.Sixty-sixth. All of the City of Colonial Heights; and part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Beach (305), Birkdale (317), Carver (112), Cosby (307), Ecoff (108), Harrowgate (106), Iron Bridge (111), Nash (211), South Chester (102), Wells (107), Winfrees Store (304), and Winterpock (306) Precincts and part of the Bailey Bridge (315) Precinct.Sixty-seventh. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Brookfield (902), Cub Run (903), Dulles (904), Fairlakes (843), Greenbriar East (846), Greenbriar West (847), Lees Corner East (920), Navy (911), Poplar Tree (928), Rocky Run (913), and Waples Mill (916) Precincts and parts of the Franklin (905), Kinross (908), Lees Corner West (927), Stone (917), and Vale (914) Precincts; and part of Loudoun County comprised of the Little River (107) Precinct and part of the Dulles South (114) Precinct.Sixty-eighth. Part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Belgrade (508), Black Heath (511), Bon Air (505), Cranbeck (509), Greenfield (506), Robious (504), Salisbury (507), Shenandoah (413), Smoketree (406), and Sycamore (510) Precincts and part of the Midlothian (503) Precinct; part of Henrico County comprised of the Monument Hills (306) and Rollingwood (413) Precincts and part of the Freeman (403) Precinct; and part of the City of Richmond comprised of the 101 (101), 102 (102), 104 (104), 105 (105), 106 (106), 111 (111), 112 (112), 113 (113), 114 (114), 207 (207), 409 (409), and 413 (413) Precincts and part of the 410 (410) Precinct.Sixty-ninth. Part of Chesterfield County comprised of part of the Davis (515) Precinct; and part of the City of Richmond comprised of the 402 (402), 404 (404), 412 (412), 501 (501), 503 (503), 504 (504), 508 (508), 509 (509), 510 (510), 610 (610), 802 (802), 810 (810), 811 (811), 902 (902), 903 (903), 908 (908), 909 (909), 910 (910), and 911 (911) Precincts and parts of the 211 (211), 410 (410), 505 (505), and 609 (609) Precincts.Seventieth. Part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Belmont (206), Chippenham (207), Drewry’s Bluff (105), Falling Creek (205), Meadowbrook (208), and Southside (213) Precincts; part of Henrico County comprised of the Central Gardens (206), Eanes (506), Masonic (510), Mehfoud (511), Montrose (512), Rolfe (519), and Sullivans (516) Precincts and part of the Dorey (505) Precinct; and part of the City of Richmond comprised of the 705 (705), 806 (806), 812 (812), and 814 (814) Precincts and parts of the 609 (609) and 703 (703) Precincts.Seventy-first. Part of Henrico County comprised of the Ratcliffe (220) Precinct; and part of the City of Richmond comprised of the 203 (203), 204 (204), 206 (206), 208 (208), 212 (212), 213 (213), 302 (302), 303 (303), 304 (304), 305 (305), 306 (306), 307 (307), 308 (308), 309 (309), 602 (602), 603 (603), 604 (604), 606 (606), 607 (607), 701 (701), 702 (702), 706 (706), and 707 (707) Precincts and parts of the 211 (211), 505 (505), and 703 (703) Precincts.Seventy-second. Part of Henrico County comprised of the Canterbury (205), Coalpit (101), Dumbarton (102), Gayton (404), Glen Allen (103), Godwin (405), Hermitage (106), Hilliard (107), Hunton (108), Innsbrook (304), Lakeside (110), Lakewood (406), Lauderdale (407), Maude Trevvett (112), Maybeury (408), Mooreland (409), Mountain (217), Oakview (218), Pocahontas (308), Ridgefield (412), Stoney Run (314), Stratford Hall (221), Summit Court (114), and Wellborne (417) Precincts and parts of the Belmont (203), Brookland (204), Derbyshire (402), and Moody (216) Precincts.Seventy-third. Part of Henrico County comprised of the Byrd (401), Cedarfield (302), Crestview (303), Glenside (104), Greendale (105), Hungary Creek (116), Jackson Davis (305), Johnson (109), Longan (111), Pemberton (410), Pinchbeck (411), Ridge (309), Skipwith (312), Spottswood (414), Springfield (313), Staples Mill (113), Three Chopt (315), Tuckahoe (415), Tucker (316), and Westwood (115) Precincts and parts of the Derbyshire (402) and Freeman (403) Precincts.Seventy-fourth. All of Charles City County; part of Henrico County comprised of the Adams (201), Antioch (501), Azalea (202), Cedar Fork (502), Chamberlayne (207), Chickahominy (503), Donahoe (504), Elko (507), Fairfield (208), Glen Lea (209), Greenwood (210), Highland Gardens (211), Highland Springs (508), Hollybrook (212), Hungary (213), Laburnum (509), Longdale (214), Maplewood (215), Nine Mile (513), Pleasants (514), Randolph (219), Wilder (222), and Yellow Tavern (223) Precincts and parts of the Belmont (203), Brookland (204), and Moody (216) Precincts; and part of the City of Richmond comprised of the 301 (301) Precinct.Seventy-fifth. All of Brunswick and Greensville Counties; all of the City of Emporia; part of Dinwiddie County comprised of the Cherry Hill (403), Little Zion (402), McKenney (502), and Reams (301) Precincts and parts of the Dinwiddie (401), Edgehill (201), New Hope (302), and Rohoic (101) Precincts; part of Isle of Wight County comprised of parts of the Camps Mill (502) and Carrsville (503) Precincts; part of Lunenburg County comprised of the Hounds Creek (601) Precinct and parts of the Brown’s Store (201), Peoples Community Center (502), Rosebud (301), and Victoria Public Library (702) Precincts; part of Southampton County comprised of the Blackwater River (701), Boykins (201), Branchville (202), Capron (301), Courtland (601), Drewryville (401), Meherrin (203), Newsoms (702), and Sebrell (302) Precincts and part of the Forks-Of-The-River (502) Precinct; part of Surry County comprised of the Dendron (301) Precinct; part of Sussex County comprised of the Courthouse (301), Henry (501), Little Mill (202), Mars Hill (401), Newville (602), Stony Creek (201), Waverly (101), West Wakefield (402), and Yale (502) Precincts; and part of the City of Franklin comprised of the Precinct

3-1

(301), Precinct

4-1

(401), and Precinct

5-1

(501) Precincts and parts of the Precinct

2-1

(201) and Precinct

6-1
